California statutes. Penal Code
 Government Code, nor shall they be subject to discovery pursuant to any provision of Title 3 (commencing with Section 1985) of Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure or Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 19570) of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code in any manner:

(1) All reports, papers, correspondence, memoranda, electronic communications, or other documents that are otherwise exempt from disclosure pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (d) of Section 6126.5, Section 6126.6, subdivision (c) of Section 6128, subdivision (c) of Section 6126, or all other applicable laws regarding confidentiality, including, but not limited to, the California Public Records Act, the Public Safety Officers’ Procedural Bill of Rights, the Information Practices Act of 1977, the Confidentiality of Medical Information Act of 1977, and the provisions of Section 832.7, relating to the disposition notification for complaints against peace
 officers.

(2) Any papers, correspondence, memoranda, electronic communications, or other documents pertaining to any audit or review that has not been completed.

(3) Any papers, correspondence, memoranda, electronic communications, or other documents pertaining to internal discussions between the Inspector General and the Inspector General’s staff, or between staff members of the Inspector General, or any personal notes of the Inspector General or the Inspector General’s staff.

(4) All identifying information, and any personal papers or correspondence from any person requesting assistance from the Inspector General, except in those cases where the Inspector General determines that disclosure of the information is necessary in the interests of justice.

(5) Any papers, correspondence, memoranda, electronic communications, or other documents pertaining to contemporaneous public oversight pursuant to Section 6133 or subdivision
 (h) or (i) of Section 6126.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 10, Sec. 18.   (AB 134)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6126.4.

It is a misdemeanor for the Inspector General or any employee or former employee of the Inspector General to divulge or make known in any manner not expressly permitted by law to any person not employed by the Inspector General any particulars of any record, document, or information the disclosure of which is restricted by law from release to the public. This prohibition is also applicable to any person who has been furnished
 a draft copy of any report for comment or review or any person or business entity that is contracting with or has contracted with the Inspector General and to the employees and former employees of that person or business entity or the employees of any state agency or public entity that has assisted the Inspector General in connection with duties authorized by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 36, Sec. 40.   (SB 92)   Effective June 30, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

6126.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the Inspector General during regular business hours or at any other time determined necessary by the Inspector General, shall have access to and authority to examine and reproduce any and all books, accounts, reports, vouchers, correspondence files, documents, and other records, and to examine the bank accounts, money, or other property of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation in connection with duties authorized by this chapter. Any officer or employee of any agency or entity having these records or property in their possession or under their control shall permit access to, and examination and reproduction thereof consistent with the provisions of this section, upon the request of the
 Inspector General or the Inspector General’s authorized representative.

(b) In connection with duties authorized by this chapter, the Inspector General or the Inspector General’s authorized representative shall have access to the records and property of any public or private entity or person subject to review or regulation by the public agency or public entity to the same extent that employees or officers of that agency or public entity have access. No provision of law, memorandum of understanding, or any other agreement entered into between the employing entity and the employee or the employee’s representative providing for the confidentiality or privilege of any records or property shall prevent disclosure pursuant to subdivision (a). Access, examination, and reproduction consistent with the provisions of this section shall not
 result in the waiver of any confidentiality or privilege regarding any records or property.

(c) Any officer or person who fails or refuses to permit access, examination, or reproduction, as required by this section, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(d) The Inspector General may require any employee of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to be interviewed on a confidential basis. Any employee requested to be interviewed shall comply and shall have time afforded by the appointing authority for the purpose of an interview with the Inspector General or the Inspector General’s designee. The Inspector General shall have the discretion to redact the name or other identifying information of any person interviewed from any public report issued by the Inspector General, where
 required by law or where the failure to redact the information may hinder prosecution or an action in a criminal, civil, or administrative proceeding, or where the Inspector General determines that disclosure of the information is not in the interests of justice. It is not the purpose of these communications to address disciplinary action or grievance procedures that may routinely occur. When conducting an investigation into allegations that an employee of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation engaged in misconduct, the Inspector General shall comply with Sections 3303, 3307, 3307.5, 3308, 3309, and subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, of Section 3309.5 of the Government Code, except that the Inspector General shall not be subject to the provisions of any memorandum of understanding or other agreement entered into between the employing entity and the employee or the
 employee’s representative that is in conflict with, or adds to the requirements of, Sections 3303, 3307, 3307.5, 3308, 3309, and subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, of Section 3309.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 364, Sec. 15.   (SB 112)   Effective September 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6126.6.

(a) Prior to filling a vacancy for warden by appointment pursuant to Section 6050, or superintendent pursuant to Section 1049 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the Governor shall first submit to the Inspector General the names of candidates for the position of warden or superintendent for review of their qualifications.

(b) (1) Upon receipt of the names of those candidates and their completed personal data questionnaires, the Inspector General shall employ appropriate confidential procedures to evaluate and determine the qualifications of each candidate with regard to his or her ability to discharge the duties of the office to which the appointment or nomination is made.

 (2) Within 90 days of submission by the Governor of those names, the Inspector General shall advise in confidence to the Governor his or her recommendation whether the candidate is exceptionally well-qualified, well-qualified, qualified, or not qualified and the reasons therefore, and may report, in confidence, any other information that the Inspector General deems pertinent to the qualifications of the candidate.

(c) In reviewing the qualifications of a candidate for the position of warden or superintendent, the
 Inspector General shall consider, among other appropriate factors, his or her experience in effectively managing correctional facilities and inmate or ward populations; ability to deal effectively with employees, detained persons and other interested persons in addressing management, confinement, and safety issues in an effective, fair, and professional manner; and knowledge of correctional best practices.

(d) The Inspector General shall establish and adopt rules and procedures regarding the review of the qualifications of candidates for the position of warden or superintendent. Those rules and procedures shall establish appropriate, confidential methods for disclosing to the candidate the subject matter of substantial and credible adverse allegations received regarding the candidate’s reputation and integrity which, unless rebutted, would be determinative of the candidate’s unsuitability for appointment. A rule or procedure shall not be
 adopted that permits the disclosure to the candidate of information from which the candidate may infer the source, and information shall neither be disclosed to the candidate nor be obtainable by any process that would jeopardize the confidentiality of communications from persons whose opinion has been sought on the candidate’s qualifications.

(e) All communications, written, verbal, or otherwise, of and to the Governor, the Governor’s authorized agents or employees, including, but not limited to, the Governor’s Legal Affairs Secretary and Appointments Secretary, or of and to the Inspector General in furtherance of the purposes of this section are absolutely privileged from disclosure and confidential, and any communication made in the discretion of the Governor or the Inspector General with a candidate or person providing information in furtherance of the purposes of this section shall not constitute a waiver of the privilege or a breach of
 confidentiality.

(f) When the Governor has appointed a person to the position of warden or superintendent who has been found not qualified by the Inspector General, the Inspector General shall make public that finding, after due notice to the appointee of his or her intention to do so. That notice and disclosure shall not constitute a waiver of privilege or breach of confidentiality with respect to communications of or to the Inspector General concerning the qualifications of the appointee.

(g) A person or entity shall not be liable for any injury caused by any act or failure to act, be it negligent, intentional, discretionary, or otherwise, in the furtherance of the purposes of this section, including, but not limited to, providing or receiving any information, making any recommendations, and giving any reasons therefore.

(h) As used in this section, the term “Inspector General” includes employees and agents of the Office of the Inspector General.

(i) At any time prior to the receipt of the review from the Inspector General specified in subdivision (b), the Governor may withdraw the name of any person submitted to the Inspector General for evaluation pursuant to this section.

(j) No candidate for the position of warden or superintendent may be appointed until the Inspector General has advised the Governor pursuant to this section, or until 90 days have elapsed after submission of the candidate’s name to the Inspector General, whichever occurs earlier. The requirement of this subdivision shall not apply to any vacancy in the position of warden or superintendent occurring within the 90 days preceding the expiration of the Governor’s term of office, provided, however, that with respect to
 those vacancies, the Governor shall be required to submit any candidate’s name to the Inspector General in order to provide him or her an opportunity, if time permits, to review and make a report.

(k) This section shall not be construed as imposing an additional requirement for an appointment or nomination to the position of warden or superintendent, nor shall anything in this section be construed as adding any additional qualifications for the position of warden or superintendent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 30, Sec. 10.   (SB 74)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

6127.1.

The Inspector General shall be deemed to be a department head for the purpose of Section 11189 of the Government Code in connection with any duties authorized by this chapter. The Inspector General shall have authority to hire or retain counsel to provide confidential advice. If the Attorney General has a conflict of interest in representing the Inspector General in any litigation, the Inspector General shall have authority
 to hire or retain counsel to represent the Inspector General.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 36, Sec. 42.   (SB 92)   Effective June 30, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

6127.3.

(a) In connection with duties authorized pursuant to this chapter, the Office of the Inspector General may do any of the following:

(1) Administer oaths.

(2) Certify to all official acts.

(3) Issue subpoenas for
 the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers, books, accounts, or documents in any medium, or for the making of oral or written sworn statements, in any interview conducted pursuant to duties authorized by this chapter.

(b) Any subpoena issued under this chapter extends as process to all parts of the state and may be served by any person authorized to serve process of courts of record or by any person designated for that purpose by the office. The person serving this process may receive compensation as is allowed by the office, not to exceed the fees prescribed by law for similar service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 36, Sec. 43.   (SB 92)   Effective June 30, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

6127.4.

(a) The superior court in the county in which any interview is held under the direction of the Inspector General, or his or her designee, pursuant to duties authorized by this chapter has jurisdiction to compel the attendance of witnesses, the making of oral or written sworn statements, and the production of papers, books, accounts, and documents, as required by any subpoena issued by the office.

(b) If any witness refuses to attend or testify or produce any papers required by the subpoena, the Inspector General, or his or her designee, may petition the superior court in the county in which the hearing is pending for an order compelling the person to attend and answer questions under penalty of perjury or produce the papers required by the subpoena before the person named in the subpoena. The petition shall set forth all of the following:

(1) That due notice of the time and place of attendance of the person or the production of the papers has been given.

(2) That the person has been subpoenaed in the manner prescribed in this chapter.

(3) That the person has failed and refused to attend or produce the papers required by subpoena before the office
 as named in the subpoena, or has refused to answer questions propounded to him or her in the course of the interview under penalty of perjury.

(c) Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall enter an order directing the person to appear before the court at a specified time and place and then and there show cause why he or she has not attended, answered questions under penalty of perjury, or produced the papers as required. A copy of the order shall be served upon him or her. If it appears to the court that the subpoena was regularly issued by the Inspector General, or his or her designee, the court shall enter an order that the person appear before the person named in the subpoena at the time and place fixed in the order and answer questions under penalty of perjury or produce the required papers. Upon failure to obey the order, the person shall be dealt with as for contempt of court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 36, Sec. 44.   (SB 92)   Effective June 30, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

6128.

(a) The Office of the Inspector General may receive communications from any individual, including those employed by any department, board, or authority who believes he or she may have information that may describe an improper governmental activity, as that term is defined in subdivision (c) of Section 8547.2 of the Government Code. It is not the purpose of these communications to redress any single
 disciplinary action or grievance that may routinely occur.

(b) In order to properly respond to any allegation of improper governmental activity, the Inspector General shall establish a toll-free public telephone number for the purpose of identifying any alleged wrongdoing by an employee of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. This telephone number shall be posted by the department in clear view of all employees and the public. When requested pursuant to Section 6126, the Inspector General shall initiate a review of any alleged improper governmental activity.

(c) All identifying information, and any personal papers or correspondence from any person who initiated the review shall not be disclosed, except in those cases where the Inspector General determines that disclosure of the information is necessary in the interests of justice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 36, Sec. 45.   (SB 92)   Effective June 30, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

6129.

(a) (1) For purposes of this section, “employee” means any person employed by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(2) For purposes of this section, “retaliation” means intentionally engaging in acts of reprisal, retaliation, threats, coercion, or similar acts against another employee who has done any of the
 following:

(A) Has disclosed or is disclosing to any employee at a supervisory or managerial level, what the employee, in good faith, believes to be improper governmental activities.

(B) Has cooperated or is cooperating with any investigation of improper governmental activities.

(C) Has refused to obey an illegal order or directive.

(b) (1) Upon receiving a complaint of retaliation from an employee against a member of management at the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the Inspector General shall commence an inquiry into the complaint and conduct a formal investigation where a legally cognizable cause of action is presented. All investigations conducted pursuant to this section shall be performed in accordance with
 Sections 6126.5 and 6127.3. The Inspector General may refer all other matters for investigation by the appropriate employing entity, subject to oversight by the Inspector General. In a case in which the employing entity declines to investigate the complaint, it shall, within 30 days of receipt of the referral by the Inspector General, notify the Inspector General of its decision. The Inspector General shall thereafter, conduct his or her own inquiry into the complaint. If, after reviewing the complaint, the Inspector General determines that a legally cognizable cause of action has not been presented by the complaint, the Inspector General shall thereafter notify the complaining employee and the State Personnel Board that a formal investigation is not warranted.

(2) When investigating a complaint, in determining whether retaliation has occurred, the Inspector General or the employing entity shall consider, among other things, whether any of the
 following either actually occurred or were threatened:

(A) Unwarranted or unjustified staff changes.

(B) Unwarranted or unjustified letters of reprimand or other disciplinary actions, or unsatisfactory evaluations.

(C) Unwarranted or unjustified formal or informal investigations.

(D) Engaging in acts, or encouraging or permitting other employees to engage in acts, that are unprofessional, or foster a hostile work environment.

(E) Engaging in acts, or encouraging or permitting other employees to engage in acts, that are contrary to the rules, regulations, or policies of the workplace.

(3) In a case in which the complaining
 employee has also filed a retaliation complaint with the State Personnel Board pursuant to Sections 8547.8 and 19683 of the Government Code, the State Personnel Board shall have the discretion to toll any investigation, hearing, or other proceeding that would otherwise be conducted by the State Personnel Board in response to that complaint, pending either the completion of the Inspector General’s or the employing entity’s investigation, or until the complaint is rejected or otherwise dismissed by the Inspector General or the employing entity. An employee, however, may not be required to first file a retaliation complaint with the Inspector General prior to filing a complaint with the State Personnel Board.

(A) In a case in which the complaining employee has filed a retaliation complaint with the Inspector General but not with the State Personnel Board, the limitation period for filing a retaliation complaint with the State Personnel Board shall
 be tolled until the time the Inspector General or the employing entity either issues its report to the State Personnel Board, or until the complaint is rejected or otherwise dismissed by the Inspector General or the employing entity.

(B) In order to facilitate coordination of efforts between the Inspector General and the State Personnel Board, the Inspector General shall notify the State Personnel Board of the identity of any employee who has filed a retaliation complaint with the Inspector General, and the State Personnel Board shall notify the Inspector General of the identity of any employee who has filed a retaliation complaint with the State Personnel Board.

(c) (1) In a case in which the Inspector General determines, as a result of his or her own investigation, that an employee has been subjected to acts of reprisal, retaliation, threats, or similar
 acts in violation of this section, the Inspector General shall provide a copy of the report, together with all other underlying materials the Inspector General determines to be relevant, to the appropriate director or chair who shall take appropriate corrective action. In a case in which the Inspector General determines, based on an independent review of the investigation conducted by the employing entity, that an employee has been subjected to acts of reprisal, retaliation, threats, or similar acts in violation of this section, the Inspector General shall submit a written recommendation to the appropriate director or chair who shall take appropriate corrective action. If the hiring authority initiates disciplinary action as defined in Section 19570 of the Government Code, it shall provide the subject with all materials required by law.

(2) Any employee at any rank and file, supervisory, or managerial level, who intentionally engages in acts of
 reprisal, retaliation, threats, coercion, or similar acts against another employee, pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), shall be disciplined by the employing entity by adverse action as provided in Section 19572 of the Government Code. The disciplinary action shall require, at a minimum, a suspension for not less than 30 days without pay, except in a case in which the employing entity determines that a lesser penalty is warranted. In that case, the employing entity shall, within 30 days of receipt of the report, provide written justification for that decision to the Inspector General. The employing entity shall also, within 30 days of receipt of the written report, notify the Inspector General in writing as to what steps, if any, it has taken to remedy the retaliatory conduct found to have been committed by any of its employees.

(d) (1) In an instance in which the appropriate director or chair declines to take
 adverse action against any employee found by the Inspector General to have engaged in acts of reprisal, retaliation, threats, or similar acts in violation of this section, the director or chair shall notify the Inspector General of that fact in writing within 30 days of receipt of the report from the Inspector General, and shall notify the Inspector General of the specific reasons why the director or chair declined to invoke adverse action proceedings against the employee.

(2) The Inspector General shall, thereafter, with the written consent of the complaining employee, forward an unredacted copy of the report, together with all other underlying materials the Inspector General deems to be relevant, to the State Personnel Board so that the complaining employee can request leave to file charges against the employee found to have engaged in acts of reprisal, retaliation, threats, or similar acts, in accordance with the provisions of Section
 19583.5 of the Government Code. If the State Personnel Board accepts the complaint, the board shall provide the charged and complaining parties with a copy of all relevant materials.

(3) In addition to all other penalties provided by law, including Section 8547.8 of the Government Code or any other penalties that the sanctioning authority may determine to be appropriate, any state employee at any rank and file, supervisory, or managerial level found by the State Personnel Board to have intentionally engaged in acts of reprisal, retaliation, threats, or coercion shall be suspended for not less than 30 days without pay, and shall be liable in an action for damages brought against him or her by the injured party. If the State Personnel Board determines that a lesser period of suspension is warranted, the reasons for that determination must be justified in writing in the decision.

(e) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the employing entity from exercising its authority to terminate, suspend, or discipline an employee who engages in conduct prohibited by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 30, Sec. 11.   (SB 74)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

6130.

(a) (1) The Office of the Inspector General shall post the Centralized List of Disapproved Publications maintained by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation on its internet website. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall notify the Office of the Inspector General each time a change is made to the Centralized List of Disapproved Publications.

(2) The Centralized List of Disapproved Publications shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information about each prohibited publication on the list:

(A) The title.

(B) The author.

(C) The publisher.

(D) The year of publication, to the extent available.

(E) The stated violation of department regulations that caused the publication to be prohibited.

(b) Upon a request by an incarcerated person, publisher, or other affected person, the Office of the Inspector General may review a publication on the Centralized List of Disapproved Publications to determine if
 the office concurs with the department’s determination that the publication is in violation of department regulations. The office shall notify the department if the office does not concur with the department’s determination that a publication that the office has reviewed pursuant to this subdivision is in violation of the department’s regulations.

(c) For purposes of this section, “publication” means any newspaper, periodical, magazine, or book that can be mailed through the United States Postal Service.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 620, Sec. 1.   (AB 1986)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6132.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the Inspector General shall report annually to the Governor and the Legislature a summary of its reports. The summary shall be posted on the office’s internet website and otherwise made available to the public upon its release to the Governor and the Legislature. The summary shall include, but not be limited to, significant problems discovered by the office, and whether recommendations the office has made have been
 implemented.

(2) The report shall also include a summary of the determinations that the Office of the Inspector General made regarding each publication the office reviewed pursuant to Section 6130 and the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation’s response to each notification that the office issued indicating that the office did not concur with the department’s determination that a publication is in violation of the department’s regulations.

(b) A report pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 620, Sec. 2.   (AB 1986)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6133.

(a) (1) The Office of the Inspector General shall be responsible for contemporaneous public oversight of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation investigations and staff grievance inquiries conducted by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation’s Office of Internal Affairs.

(2) To facilitate oversight of the department’s internal affairs investigations, the Office of the Inspector General shall have staff physically colocated with the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation’s Office of Internal Affairs, within a reasonable timeframe and without undue delays.

(3) The Office of the Inspector
 General shall be responsible for advising the public regarding the adequacy of each investigation and whether discipline of the subject of the investigation is warranted.

(4) The Office of the Inspector General shall have discretion to provide public oversight of other Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation personnel investigations, as needed.

(5) The Office of the Inspector General shall have investigatory authority over all staff misconduct cases that involve sexual misconduct with an incarcerated person as set forth in paragraph (7).

(6) The Office of the Inspector General may monitor and investigate a complaint that involves sexual misconduct with an incarcerated person as set forth in paragraph (7).

(7) (A) The Office of the Inspector General may exercise its investigatory authority in both of the following situations:

(i) The Office of the Inspector General may perform a full investigation into a complaint that involves sexual misconduct that the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation has not opened for investigation.

(ii) During an investigation being performed by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, if the Office of the Inspector General determines the department is not performing an adequate investigation, the Office of the Inspector General may perform the supplemental investigative measures it deems necessary to ensure the investigation is performed adequately, including, but not limited to, interviewing subjects and witnesses, reviewing and gathering records, and collecting evidence.

(B) The Office of the Inspector General shall not exercise its investigative authority in a manner that duplicates investigative efforts or interferes with an ongoing investigation being performed by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(8) (A) Upon completion of an investigation pursuant to this subdivision, the Office of the Inspector General shall
 compile an investigation report and provide a copy of the report, together with all underlying evidence gathered during the investigation, to the appropriate hiring authority within the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(B) The Office of the Inspector General shall monitor the actions the hiring authority takes after receiving the investigation report and report the results of its monitoring in accordance with subdivision (b).

(b) (1) The Office of the Inspector General shall issue regular reports, no less than annually, to the Governor and the Legislature summarizing its recommendations concerning its oversight of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation allegations of internal misconduct and use of force. The Office of the Inspector General shall also issue regular
 reports, no less than semiannually, summarizing its oversight of Office of Internal Affairs investigations pursuant to subdivision (a). The reports shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Data on the number, type, and disposition of complaints made against correctional officers and staff.

(B) A synopsis of each matter reviewed by the Office of the Inspector General.

(C) An assessment of the quality of the investigation, the appropriateness of any disciplinary charges, the Office of the Inspector General’s recommendations regarding the disposition in the case and, when founded, the level of discipline afforded, and the degree to which the agency’s authorities agreed with the Office of the
 Inspector General recommendations regarding disposition and level of discipline.

(D) The report of any settlement and whether the Office of the Inspector General concurred with the settlement.

(E) The extent to which any discipline was modified after imposition.

(2) The reports shall be in a form that does not identify the agency employees involved in the alleged misconduct.

(3) The reports shall be posted on the Inspector General’s internet website and otherwise made available to the public upon their release to the Governor and the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 1012, Sec. 1.   (SB 1069)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Conservation Centers [6200. - 6208.]

6200.

There are hereby established, under the jurisdiction of the Director of Corrections, the Sierra Conservation Center, the North Coast Conservation Center and the Southern Conservation Center, hereafter referred to collectively as the “conservation centers.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 909.)
-------------------------------------------

6201.

The primary purpose of the conservation centers shall be the receiving, employment, care, custody and education of inmates in the custody of the Director of Corrections assigned thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1431.)
-------------------------------------------

6202.

(a) Work of inmates assigned to the conservation centers may be performed at the conservation centers or branches thereof or in or from permanent, temporary, and mobile camps established pursuant to this chapter or pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 2780) of Chapter 5 of Title 1 of Part 3. The provisions of Sections 2780.1 to 2786, inclusive, and Sections 2788 to 2791, inclusive, are applicable to camps established pursuant to this article as well as those established pursuant to that Article 5. The
 Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation may, at such times as the secretary deems proper and on such terms as the secretary deems wise, enter into contracts or cooperative agreements with any public agency, local, state, or federal, for the performance of other conservation projects that are appropriate for the public agencies under policies which shall be established by the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority.

(b) Inmates and wards may be assigned to perform public conservation projects, including, but not limited to, forest fire prevention and control, forest and watershed management, recreational area development, fish and game management, soil conservation, and forest watershed revegetation.

(c) No
 productive industrial enterprise subject to the jurisdiction of the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority shall be established at any center or branch thereof or camp established pursuant to this chapter except in compliance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 5085) of Title 7 of Part 3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 52.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

6203.

The Director of Corrections shall, in accordance with law, construct and provide equipment for suitable buildings, structures, and facilities for the conservation centers, branches thereof, and permanent, temporary, and mobile camps operated therefrom. The director may, as necessary, lease equipment needed for the operation of mobile camps. The Sierra Conservation Center shall be located in the Tuolumne area of California. The North Coast Conservation Center shall be located in the North Coast area of California. The Southern Conservation Center shall be located on the grounds of the California Institution for Men at Chino. The director may establish such branches of the
 conservation centers as may be necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 909.)
-------------------------------------------

6204.

The Director of Corrections shall make rules and regulations for the government of the conservation centers in the management of their affairs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1431.)
-------------------------------------------

6205.

Each conservation center shall be headed by a warden, appointed pursuant to Section 6050, and the Director of Corrections shall appoint, subject to civil service, other officers and employees as may be necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1420, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

6206.

The supervision, management, and control of the conservation centers and the responsibility for the care, custody, treatment, training, discipline, and employment of persons confined therein or in branches thereof or in permanent, temporary, and mobile camps operating therefrom are vested in the Director of Corrections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1431.)
-------------------------------------------

6207.

The provisions of Part 3 (commencing with Section 2000), insofar as applicable, apply to the conservation centers and branches thereof and any permanent, temporary, and mobile camps operating therefrom and to the persons confined therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 165.)
-------------------------------------------

6208.

Any persons under the custody of the Director of Corrections may be transferred to the conservation centers in accordance with law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1431.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9.2. Restitution Centers [6220. - 6236.]

6220.

The Director of Corrections may establish and operate facilities to be known as restitution centers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1520, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6221.

The purpose of restitution centers is to provide a means for those sentenced to prison to be able to pay their victims’ financial restitution, which includes direct restitution to victims as well as other restitution fines and fees, as ordered by the sentencing court or as agreed upon by the defendant and his or her victims. Inmates who commit crimes involving a direct victim shall receive priority placement in restitution
 centers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 463, Sec. 2.   (AB 2218)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

6222.

The location for a restitution center or centers shall be determined by the Director of Corrections with approval from the county board of supervisors or city council in whose jurisdiction the center will be located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1520, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6223.

Restitution centers shall be located in areas which will maximize the employment opportunities of persons sentenced to the centers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1520, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6224.

The supervision, management, and control of the restitution centers and the responsibility for the care, custody, discipline, and employment of persons confined therein are vested in the Director of Corrections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1520, Sec. 1.)